Utah statutes.
9-4-911.   Corporation -- Additional powers.
(1)  To accomplish the declared purposes of this part, the corporation has the
following powers in addition to others granted in this part:
(a)  to purchase mortgage loans originated by mortgage lenders or local public
bodies made for the purpose of financing the construction, development,
rehabilitation, or purchase of residential housing for low and moderate income
persons;
(b)  to make mortgage loans and to provide financial assistance to housing
sponsors for the purpose of financing the construction, development,
rehabilitation, or purchase of residential housing for low and moderate income
persons;
(c)  to make mortgage loans and provide financial assistance to housing
sponsors for the purpose of financing the operations of a housing development
that are necessary or desirable to enable the housing development to remain
available as residential housing for low and moderate income persons, whether
or not the housing development has been financed by the corporation;
(d)  to provide financial assistance to any housing authority created under
Part 6, which housing authorities may enter into commitments for and accept
loans for a housing project or projects as defined in Section 9-4-602; and
(e)  to make mortgage loans and to provide financial assistance to low and
moderate income persons for the construction, rehabilitation, or purchase of
residential housing.
(2)  Bonds to purchase loans pursuant to Subsection (1)(a) shall be issued
only after a determination by the corporation that the loans are not otherwise
available upon reasonably equivalent terms and conditions from private
lenders.
(3)  Loans for owner-occupied housing made pursuant to Subsection (1)(a) may
not include a penalty for prepayment.
(4)  The corporation shall make rules or adopt policies and procedures to
govern the activities authorized under this section including rules, policies,
and procedures as to any or all of the following:
(a)  procedures for the submission of requests or the invitation of proposals
for the purchase and sale of mortgage loans and the making of mortgage loans;
(b)  rates, fees, charges, and other terms and conditions of originating or
servicing mortgage loans in order to protect against a realization of an
excessive financial return or benefit by the originator or servicer;
(c)  the type and amount of collateral, payment bonds, performance bonds, or
other security to be provided for construction loans made by the corporation;
(d)  the nature and amounts of fees to be charged by the corporation to
provide for expenses and reserves of the corporation;
(e)  procedures allowing the corporation to prohibit persons who fail to
comply with the rules of the corporation with respect to the operations of any
program of the corporation from participating, either directly or indirectly,
in the programs of the corporation;
(f)  the terms and conditions under which the corporation may purchase and
make mortgage loans under each program of the corporation;
(g)  the terms and conditions under which the corporation may provide
financial assistance under each program of the corporation;
(h)  the terms and conditions under which the corporation may guarantee
mortgage loans under each program of the corporation; and
(i)  any other matters related to the duties or exercise of powers under this
section.
(5) (a)  The trustees of the corporation shall elect the directors, trustees,
members, if any, of each subsidiary. Service by a trustee of the corporation
in any such capacity does not constitute a conflict of interest for any
purpose. The corporation may delegate any of its powers and duties under this
part to any subsidiary. Subsidiaries shall constitute legal entities separate
and distinct from each other, the corporation, and the state.
(b)  Each note, bond, and other obligation of a subsidiary shall contain on
its face a statement to the effect that:
(i)  the subsidiary is obligated to pay the same solely from the revenues or
other funds of the subsidiary;
(ii)  neither the corporation nor the state nor any of its political
subdivisions is obligated to pay the same; and
(iii)  neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any
of its political subdivisions is pledged to the payment of principal, or
redemption price of, or the interest on the note, bond, or other obligation.
(c)  Upon dissolution of any subsidiary of the corporation, any assets shall
revert to the corporation or to any successor to the corporation or, failing
this succession, to the state.
(6) (a)  The corporation may:
(i)  enter into interest rate contracts that its trustees determine are
necessary, convenient, or appropriate for the control or management of debt or
for the cost of servicing debt; and
(ii)  use corporation funds to satisfy its payment obligations under those
contracts.
(b)  Interest rate contracts may contain payment, security, default,
termination, remedy, and other terms and conditions that the trustees consider
appropriate.
(c)  Neither interest rate contracts nor funds used in connection with
interest rate contracts may be considered a deposit or investment.
